Washington statutes.
RCW 15.66.250

Price fixing and product limiting prohibited.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall permit fixing of prices not otherwise permitted by law or any limitation on production and no marketing order or agreement or any rule or regulation thereunder shall contain any such provisions.

[ 1961 c 11 s 15.66.250. Prior: 1955 c 191 s 25.]